src/fst/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VERBS !!= @CODE@
áasanggwiiʼiihl:áasanggwiiʼ CLASS-IIHL "for it to be later" ;
dah% dlaskʼwáʼiihl:dah% dlaskʼwáʼ CLASS-IIHL "for S to buy a whole outfit for C from head to toe" ;
gáwʼiihl:gáwʼ CLASS-IIHL "for S to leave X; die and leave X" ;
g̲aníihl:g̲an CLASS-IIHL "for S to have a drink of water, drink some water" ;
g̲áalgaa% tsʼándaläʼiihl:g̲áalgaa% tsʼándaläʼ CLASS-IIHL "for it to get pitch dark (on X)" ;
g̲íihl:g̲ CLASS-IIHL "for S to reach location" ;
INS% jángʼiihl:INS% jángʼ CLASS-IIHL "for S to make O (sg) longer, taller, higher (by measure) (than X)" ;
INS% sdángʼiihl:INS% sdángʼ CLASS-IIHL "for S to make two C out of X" ;
ja% gáwʼiihl:ja% gáwʼ CLASS-IIHL "for S to be at C at gabling, to take Cʼs money in gambling" ;
ki% tʼámgadʼiihl:ki% tʼámgadʼ CLASS-IIHL "for S to draw a faint or fine line on C" ;
kíl% gáwʼiihl:kíl% gáwʼ CLASS-IIHL "for S to stop, put an end to C [said of bad habits]" ;
k̲a% g̲íihl:k̲a% g̲ CLASS-IIHL "for that to be the result" ;
k̲ʼi% k̲wáanʼiihl:k̲ʼi% k̲wáanʼ CLASS-IIHL "for S to cut lots of C (from X)" ;
k̲ʼíi% sg̲atsʼäʼíihl:k̲ʼíi% sg̲atsʼäʼ CLASS-IIHL "for S to have become cranky in their old age" ;
k̲wáanʼiihl:k̲wáanʼ CLASS-IIHL "V many times so far" ;
naʼíihl:naʼ CLASS-IIHL "for S (sg) to settle down" ;
níihl:n CLASS-IIHL "for S to drink O (from, out of X) [said of liquids or containers]" ;
sdíihl:sd CLASS-IIHL "for S to change their mind about going, to return, go back (in direction) (distance of measure), to turn back (in direction)" ;
sgi% k̲wáanʼiihl:sgi% k̲wáanʼ CLASS-IIHL "for S to make chop lots of C, make there be lots of C by chopping (from X)" ;
sg̲atsʼäʼíihl:sg̲atsʼäʼ CLASS-IIHL "for S to not want to let go of X, to claim X" ;
skin%.gaʼíihl:skin%.gaʼ CLASS-IIHL "for S to be wide awake" ;
sk̲ʼáangwʼiihl:sk̲ʼáangwʼ CLASS-IIHL "for S to have become woody [said of the new shoots of a salmonberry bush]" ;
tadaʼíihl:tadaʼ CLASS-IIHL "for the weather to get cold on X" ;
tla% gyaʼánskʼudäʼiihl:tla% gyaʼánskʼudäʼ CLASS-IIHL "for S to dress C" ;
tla% g̲íihl:tla% g̲ CLASS-IIHL "for S to correct C, set C right" ;
tla% íwaadäʼiihl:tla% íwaadäʼ CLASS-IIHL "for S to expand, enlarge C (pl), make C (pl) bigger, larger" ;
tla% íwaanʼiihl:tla% íwaanʼ CLASS-IIHL "for S to expand, enlarge C (sg), make C (sg) bigger, larger" ;
tla% k̲wáanʼiihl:tla% k̲wáanʼ CLASS-IIHL "for S to make lots of C, make there be lots of C (from X)" ;
xál% g̲wáasadʼiihl:xál% g̲wáasadʼ CLASS-IIHL "for S to have been bleached to a reddish-brown color by the sun [said of hair only]" ;
x̲áwlaʼiihl:x̲áwlaʼ CLASS-IIHL "for S to have an orgasm" ;
íihl: CLASS-IIHL "for S to have Vʼed (so much) so far" ; !! V2
